Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.080

City manager—Powers and duties.

The powers and duties of the city manager shall be:

(1) To have general supervision over the administrative affairs of the code city;

(2) To appoint and remove at any time all department heads, officers, and employees of the code city, except members of the council, and subject to the provisions of any applicable law, rule, or regulation relating to civil service: PROVIDED, That the council may provide for the appointment by the mayor, subject to confirmation by the council, of a city planning commission, and other advisory citizens' committees, commissions, and boards advisory to the city council: PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the municipal judge of the code city is appointed, such appointment shall be made by the city manager subject to confirmation by the council, for a four year term. The council may cause an audit to be made of any department or office of the code city government and may select the persons to make it, without the advice or consent of the city manager;

(3) To attend all meetings of the council at which his or her attendance may be required by that body;

(4) To see that all laws and ordinances are faithfully executed, subject to the authority which the council may grant the mayor to maintain law and order in times of emergency;

(5) To recommend for adoption by the council such measures as he or she may deem necessary or expedient;

(6) To prepare and submit to the council such reports as may be required by that body or as he or she may deem it advisable to submit;

(7) To keep the council fully advised of the financial condition of the code city and its future needs;

(8) To prepare and submit to the council a proposed budget for the fiscal year, as required by chapter 35A.33 RCW, and to be responsible for its administration upon adoption;

(9) To perform such other duties as the council may determine by ordinance or resolution.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3025; 1987 c 3 s 17; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.080.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 3: See note following RCW 3.70.010.